Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2220.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 16-447, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE16-447. Voting devices; inspection; specifications and number of booths A. The board of supervisors shall provide at each polling place at least one device that complies with the help America vote act of 2002 (P.L. 107-252) and that is certified by the secretary of state for use by voters with disabilities.  Each accessible device that is placed at a precinct-based polling place or voting center shall be programmed and prepared so that all ballot styles for that entire jurisdiction or county are available from each device without regard to the precinct or other location in which the device is used. B. Before any election at which electronic voting devices are used, the board of supervisors or other authority in charge of elections shall have the voting devices prepared for the election and shall mail a notice to the chairmen of the county committees of the different political parties, stating that states when and where the voting devices may be inspected before they are sealed and delivered to the polling places. C. The board of supervisors or other authority in charge of elections shall have delivered to each polling place a sufficient number of voting booths and voting or marking devices. The voting booths shall be durably constructed and shall be of sufficient size and so designed as to enable the voter to mark the voter's ballot in secrecy. D. In any election, the election officer in charge of the election shall determine the number of voting devices to be used. E. The board of supervisors shall designate a person to observe the installation and modification of any election management software or computer programming used for county election administration. The board of supervisors shall also designate a person to act as a substitute if the primary designee is unavailable. The persons designated may be county employees but may not be employed by or under the supervision of the officer in charge of elections. END_STATUTE